Utah statutes.
20A-1-308.   Elections during declared emergencies.

(1)  As used in this section, "declared emergency" means a state of emergency that:

(a)  is declared by:

(i)  the president of the United States;

(ii)  the governor in an executive order under Title 63K, Chapter 4, Disaster Response and Recovery Act; or

(iii)  the chief executive officer of a political subdivision in a proclamation under Title 63K, Chapter 4, Disaster Response and Recovery Act; and

(b)  affects an election in the state, including:

(i)  voting on election day;

(ii)  early voting;

(iii)  the transmittal or voting of an absentee ballot or military-overseas ballot;

(iv)  the counting of an absentee ballot or military-overseas ballot; or

(v)  the canvassing of election returns.

(2)  During a declared emergency, the lieutenant governor may designate a method, time, or location for, or relating to, an event described in Subsection (1)(b) that is different than the method, time, or location described in this title.

(3)  The lieutenant governor shall notify a voter or potential voter of a different method, time, or location designated under Subsection (2) by:

(a)  posting a notice on the Statewide Electronic Voter Information Website established under Section 20A-7-801;

(b)  notifying each election officer affected by the designation; and

(c)  notifying a newspaper of general circulation within the state or a local media correspondent.



Enacted by Chapter 182, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 182, 2013 General Session, (Coordination Clause) 

Enacted by Chapter 219, 2013 General Session

